North Carolina, session 2025, SB478.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-130.5(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(33) Interest, fees, and penalties received by banks from loans secured by
"agricultural land" as that term is defined in G.S. 105-277.2."
SECTION 2. This act is effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2025.
*S478-v-1*